Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2336
Property owned at death and acquired by estate.

A will may provide for the passage of all property the testator owns at death and all property acquired by the estate after the testator's death.

Laws 2020, LB966, § 13.